California statutes. Penal Code
(2) In lieu of residence or business addresses, an applicant who participates in the program described in Chapter 3.1 (commencing with Section 6205) of Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government Code may provide the address designated to the applicant by the Secretary of State.

(3) In lieu of a residence, an applicant who falls within the categories described in subdivision (c) of Section 26220 may provide a business address or an alternative mailing address, such as a post office box.

(d) Completed applications for licenses shall be filed in writing and signed by the applicant, and contain all information required by
 the application, as determined by the licensing authority.

(e) Applications for amendments to licenses shall be filed in writing and signed by the applicant, and shall state what type of amendment is sought pursuant to Section 26215 and the reason for desiring the amendment.

(f) The forms shall contain a provision whereby the applicant attests to the truth of statements contained in the application.

(g) An applicant shall not be required to complete any additional application or form for a license, except to clarify or interpret information provided by the applicant on the standard application form.

(h) The standard application form described in subdivision (a) is
 deemed to be a local form expressly exempt from the requirements of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code).

(i) (1) As of 60 days after the effective date of the act that added subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a), a license issued upon the application shall set forth the licensee’s full name, driver’s license or identification number, Criminal Identification and Information number, occupation, residence and business address, the licensee’s date of birth, height, weight, and color of eyes and hair, and indicate the type of license issued as it relates to Section 26220, including license issuance and expiration date, and shall, in addition, contain the licensee’s fingerprints, a picture of the licensee,
 and a description of the weapon or weapons authorized to be carried, detailing the name of the manufacturer, the model, the serial number, and the caliber. The license issued to the licensee may be laminated. Prior to 60 days after the effective date of the act that added subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a), any license issued upon the application shall take the form of the uniform license developed by the Attorney General and used as indicia of proof of licensure throughout the state immediately prior to the effective date of the act that added this paragraph.

(2) In lieu of residence or business addresses, a licensee who participates in the program described in Chapter 3.1 (commencing with Section 6205) of Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government Code may provide the address designated to the applicant by the Secretary of
 State. Upon termination from the program described in Chapter 3.1 (commencing with Section 6205) of Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government Code, the licensee shall comply with Section 26210.

(3) In lieu of a residence address, a licensee who falls within the categories described in subdivision (c) of Section 26220 may provide a business address or an alternative mailing address, such as a post office box. Upon termination from the category described in subdivision (c) of Section 26220, the licensee shall comply with Section 26210.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 80, Sec. 106.   (SB 1525)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

26180.

(a) Any person who files an application required by Section 26175 knowing that any statement contained therein is false is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(b) Any person who knowingly makes a false statement on the application regarding any of the following is guilty of a felony:

(1) The denial or revocation of a license, or the denial of an amendment to a license, issued pursuant to this article.

(2) A criminal conviction.

(3) A finding of not guilty by reason of insanity.

(4) The use of a controlled substance.

(5) A dishonorable discharge from military service.

(6) A commitment to a mental institution.

(7) A renunciation of United States citizenship.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

26185.

(a) (1) Upon issuance of the notice described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (d) of Section 26202, the licensing authority shall submit to the Department of Justice fingerprint images and related information required by the Department of Justice for each applicant applying for a new license to carry a pistol, revolver, or other firearm capable of being concealed upon the person, pursuant to subdivision (u) of Section 11105. The Department of Justice shall provide a state or federal response to the licensing authority, pursuant to subdivision (l) of Section 11105 of the Penal Code.

(2) Upon receipt of the fingerprints of an applicant for a new license, as well
 as the fee as prescribed in Section 26190, the department shall promptly furnish the forwarding licensing authority information as to whether the person is prohibited by state or federal law from possessing, receiving, owning, or purchasing a firearm. The department shall make this determination in a manner to be prescribed through regulations. If the department is unable to ascertain the final disposition of an arrest or criminal charge, the outcome of the mental health treatment or evaluation, or the applicant’s eligibility to possess, receive, own, or purchase a firearm, the department shall notify the forwarding licensing authority.

(3) No new license shall be issued by any licensing authority unless the department confirms the applicant’s eligibility to possess, receive, own, or purchase a firearm as described in paragraph
 (2).

(b) (1) For each applicant for a renewal license, upon issuance of the notice described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (d) of Section 26202, the licensing authority shall submit to the department the renewal notification described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (d) of Section 26202, in a manner and format prescribed by the department.

(2) For each renewal notification submitted to the department in accordance with paragraph (1) on or after September 1, 2026, the licensing authority shall also submit to the department fingerprint images and related information required by the department for each applicant applying for a renewal license to carry a pistol, revolver, or other firearm capable of being concealed upon the person, pursuant to subdivision (u)
 of Section 11105. The department shall then provide a state or federal response to the licensing authority, pursuant to subdivision (l) of Section 11105.

(c) (1) For each applicant for a renewal license, upon receipt by the department of the renewal notification as prescribed in subdivision (b), as well as the fee as prescribed in Section 26190, the department shall determine whether the applicant is prohibited by state or federal law from possessing, receiving, owning, or purchasing a firearm.

(2) For each applicant for a renewal license whose renewal notification is submitted to the department prior to September 1, 2026, the department shall determine whether the applicant is prohibited by state or federal law from possessing, receiving, owning, or
 purchasing a firearm and notify the forwarding licensing agency in a manner to be prescribed through regulations.

(3) For each applicant for a renewal license whose renewal notification is submitted to the department on or after September 1, 2026, upon receipt of the applicant’s fingerprints, the department shall promptly furnish the forwarding licensing authority information as to whether the person is prohibited by state or federal law from possessing, receiving, owning, or purchasing a firearm. The department shall make this determination in a manner to be prescribed through regulations. If the department is unable to ascertain the final disposition of an arrest or criminal charge, the outcome of the mental health treatment or evaluation, or the applicant’s eligibility to possess, receive, own, or purchase a firearm, the department shall
 notify the forwarding licensing authority. No renewal license shall be issued by any licensing authority unless the department confirms the applicant’s eligibility to possess, receive, own, or purchase a firearm as described in this paragraph.

(d) As used in this section, “licensing authority” means a sheriff of a county, or the chief or other head of a municipal police department of any city or city and county.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 570, Sec. 5.   (AB 1078)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

26190.

(a) (1) An applicant for a new license or for the renewal of a license shall pay at the time of filing the application a fee determined by the Department of Justice. The fee shall not exceed the application processing costs of the Department of Justice for the direct costs of furnishing the information and report required by Section 26185.

(2) After the department establishes fees sufficient to reimburse the department for processing costs, fees charged shall increase at a rate not to exceed the legislatively approved annual cost-of-living adjustments for the department’s budget.

(3) The officer
 receiving the application and the fee shall transmit the fee, with the fingerprints, if required, to the Department of Justice in accordance with Section 26185.

(b) (1) The licensing authority of any city, city and county, or county shall charge an additional fee in an amount equal to the reasonable costs for processing the application for a new license or a license renewal, issuing the license, and enforcing the license, including any required notices, excluding fingerprint and training costs, and shall transmit the additional fee, if any, to the city, city and county, or county treasury.

(2) The first 50 percent of this additional local fee may be collected upon filing of the initial or renewal application. The balance of the fee shall be collected only upon issuance of
 the license.

(c) These local fees may be increased to reflect increases in the licensing authority’s reasonable costs, as described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b). In no case shall the local fees exceed the reasonable costs to the licensing authority, as described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b).

(d) (1) In the case of an amended license pursuant to Section 26215, the licensing authority of any city, city and county, or county may charge a fee in an amount not to exceed the reasonable costs to process the amended license. In no case shall the amount charged to the applicant for the amended license exceed the reasonable costs to the licensing authority.

(2) This fee may be increased at
 a rate to reflect increases in the licensing authority’s reasonable costs, as described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (d). In no case shall this fee exceed the reasonable costs to the licensing authority, as described in paragraph (1).

(3) The licensing authority shall transmit the fee to the city, city and county, or county treasury.

(e) (1) If a psychological assessment on the initial application is required by the licensing authority, the license applicant shall be referred to a licensed psychologist acceptable to the licensing authority. For an applicant for a license issued pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 26150 or subdivision (b) of Section 26155, the licensing authority may either allow the applicant to complete a virtual psychological
 assessment, where the applicant appears by video and audio, or approve an examination provider located within 75 miles of the applicant’s residence. The applicant may be charged for the actual cost of the assessment. In no case shall the amount charged to the applicant for the psychological assessment exceed the reasonable costs to the licensing authority.

(2) Additional psychological assessment of an applicant seeking license renewal shall be required only if there is compelling evidence of a public safety concern to indicate that an assessment is necessary. The applicant may be charged for the actual cost of the assessment. In no case shall the cost of psychological assessment exceed the reasonable costs to the licensing authority.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 570, Sec. 6.   (AB 1078)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

26195.

(a) A license under this chapter shall not be issued by the local licensing authority if any of the following occurs:

(1) The local licensing authority is notified by the Department of Justice that the applicant is prohibited by state or federal law from possessing, receiving, owning, or purchasing a firearm.

(2) The applicant knowingly provides any inaccurate or incomplete information in connection with an application for a license or license renewal or an application to amend a license pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 26175.

(3) The applicant fails to comply
 with subdivision (c) of this section.

(b) (1) A license under this chapter shall be revoked by the local licensing authority if at any time the local licensing authority determines any of the following:

(A) The licensee has breached any of the conditions or restrictions set forth in or imposed in accordance with Section 26200.

(B) The licensee knowingly provided any inaccurate or incomplete information in connection with an application for a license or license renewal or an application to amend a license pursuant to
 subdivision (e) of Section 26175.

(C) The licensee has become a disqualified person and cannot receive such a license, as determined in accordance with the standards set forth in Section 26202.

(D) The licensee failed to comply with subdivision (c) of this section.

(2) A license under this chapter shall be revoked by the local licensing authority if at any time the local licensing authority is notified by the Department of Justice that the licensee is prohibited by state or federal law from possessing, receiving, owning, or purchasing a
 firearm.

(3) If the local licensing authority revokes the license, the Department of Justice shall be notified of the revocation and reason pursuant to Section 26225. The licensee shall also be immediately notified of the revocation in writing.

(c) A licensee under this chapter shall inform the local licensing authority that issued the license of any restraining order or arrest, charge, or conviction of a crime referenced in Section 26202.

(d) If at any time the Department of Justice determines that a licensee is prohibited by state or federal law from possessing, receiving, owning, or purchasing a firearm, the department shall immediately, but no longer than 15 days after the determination, notify the local licensing authority
 of the determination.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 570, Sec. 7.   (AB 1078)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

26200.

(a) While carrying a firearm as authorized by a license issued pursuant to this chapter, a licensee shall not do any of the following:

(1) Consume an alcoholic beverage or controlled substance as described in Sections 11053 to 11058, inclusive, of the Health and Safety Code.

(2) Be in a place having a primary purpose of dispensing alcoholic beverages for onsite consumption.

(3) Be under the influence of any alcoholic beverage, medication, or controlled substance as described in Sections 11053 to 11058, inclusive, of the Health and Safety Code.

(4) Carry a firearm not listed on the license or a firearm for which they are not the recorded owner. This paragraph does not apply to a licensee who was issued a license pursuant to Section 26170, in which case they may carry a firearm that is registered to the agency for which the licensee has been deputized or appointed to serve as a peace officer, and the licensee carries the firearm consistent with that agency’s policies.

(5) Falsely represent to a person that the licensee is a peace officer.

(6) Engage in an unjustified display of a deadly weapon.

(7) Fail to carry the license on their person.

(8) Impede a peace officer in the conduct of their activities.

(9) Refuse to display the license or to provide the firearm to a peace officer upon demand for purposes of inspecting the firearm.

(10) Violate any federal, state, or local criminal law.

(b) In addition to the restrictions and conditions listed in subdivision (a), a license issued pursuant to this chapter may also include any reasonable restrictions or conditions that the licensing authority deems warranted, including restrictions as to the time, place, manner, and circumstances under which a licensee may carry a pistol, revolver, or other firearm capable of being concealed upon the person.

(c) Any restrictions imposed pursuant to subdivision (b) shall be indicated on any license issued.

(d) A licensee authorized to carry a firearm pursuant to this chapter shall not carry more than two firearms under the licensee’s control at one time.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 249, Sec. 19.   (SB 2)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

26202.

(a) Unless a court makes a contrary determination pursuant to Section 26206, an applicant shall be deemed to be a disqualified person and cannot receive or renew a license pursuant to Section 26150, 26155, or 26170 if the applicant satisfies any one or more of the following:

(1) Is reasonably likely to be a danger to self, others, or the community at large, as demonstrated by anything in the application for a license or through the investigation described in subdivision (b), or as shown by the results of any psychological assessment, including, but not limited to, the assessment described in subdivision (e) of Section 26190.

(2) Has
 been convicted of contempt of court under Section 166 or any federal law or law of any other state that includes comparable elements of contempt of court under Section 166.

(3) Has been subject to any restraining order, protective order, or other type of court order issued pursuant to the following statutory provisions, or any federal law or law of any other state that includes comparable elements of those statutory provisions, unless that order expired or was vacated or otherwise canceled more than five years prior to the licensing authority receiving the completed application, or that order expired or was vacated or otherwise canceled and the applicant did not receive notice and an opportunity to be heard before the order was issued:

(A) Section 646.91 or Part 3 (commencing with
 Section 6240) of Division 10 of the Family Code.

(B) Part 4 (commencing with Section 6300) of Division 10 of the Family Code.

(C) Sections 136.2 and 18100.

(D) Section 527.6, 527.8, or 527.85 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(E) Section 213.5, 304, 362.4, 726.5, or 15657.03 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(4) In the 10 years prior to the licensing authority receiving the completed application for a new license or a license renewal, has been convicted of an offense listed in Section 422.6, 422.7, 422.75, or 29805, or any federal law or law of any other state that includes comparable
 elements of those offenses.

(5) Has engaged in an unlawful or reckless use, display, or brandishing of a firearm.

(6) In the 10 years prior to the licensing authority receiving the completed application for a new license or a license renewal, has been charged with any offense listed in Section 290, 667.5, 1192.7, 1192.8, or 29805, or any federal law or law of any other state that includes comparable elements of those offenses, that was dismissed pursuant to a plea or dismissed with a waiver pursuant to People v. Harvey (1979) 25 Cal.3d 754.

(7) In the five years prior to the licensing authority receiving the completed application for a new license or a license renewal, has been committed to or incarcerated in county jail
 or state prison for, or on probation, parole, postrelease community supervision, or mandatory supervision as a result of, a conviction of an offense, an element of which involves controlled substances, as described in Sections 11053 to 11058, inclusive, of the Health and Safety Code, or alcohol.

(8) Is, as described in paragraph (3) of subdivision (g) of Section 922 of Title 18 of the United States Code and applicable regulations and guidance, an unlawful user of or addicted to any controlled substance.

(9) Is currently abusing any controlled substance, as described in Sections 11053 to 11058, inclusive, of the Health and Safety Code, or alcohol. For purposes of this subdivision, the term “abusing” means excessive use or consumption reflecting that the applicant has lost the power of self-control with reference to the controlled substance or alcohol.

(10) In the 10 years prior to the licensing authority receiving the completed application for a new license or a license renewal, has experienced the loss or theft of multiple firearms due to the applicant’s lack of compliance with federal, state, or local law regarding storing, transporting, or securing the firearm. For purposes of this paragraph, “multiple firearms” includes a loss of more than one firearm on the same occasion, or
 the loss of a single firearm on more than one occasion.

(11) Failed to report a loss of a firearm as required by Section 25250 or any other state, federal, or local law requiring the reporting of the loss of a firearm.

(b) In determining whether an applicant is a disqualified person and cannot receive or renew a license in accordance with subdivision (a), the licensing authority shall conduct an investigation that meets all of the following minimum requirements:

(1) For a license issued pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 26150 or subdivision (b) of Section 26155, an in-person interview of the applicant or a virtual interview of the applicant, where the applicant appears by video and audio, at the applicant’s
 election. For renewal applications, the licensing authority may elect to forgo this requirement.

(2) In-person, virtual, or telephonic interviews with at least three character references, at least one of whom must be a person described in subdivision (b) of Section 273.5, if applicable, and at least one of whom must be the applicant’s cohabitant, if applicable. For renewal applications, the licensing authority may elect to forgo this requirement.

(3) A review of publicly available information about the applicant, including publicly available statements published or posted by the applicant.

(4) A review of all information provided in the application for a license.

(5) A review of all information provided by the Department of Justice in accordance with subdivision (a) of, paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of, and paragraph (3) of subdivision (c) of Section 26185, as well as firearms eligibility notices or any other information subsequently provided to the licensing authority regarding the applicant.

(6) A review of the information in the California Restraining and Protective Order System accessible through the California Law Enforcement Telecommunications System, including information indicating that the applicant is reasonably likely to be a danger to self, others, or the community at large pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a), or that the applicant is otherwise a disqualified person pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (a).

(c) In determining whether an applicant is a disqualified person and cannot receive or renew a license in accordance with subdivision (a), this section does not preclude the licensing authority from engaging in investigative efforts in addition to those listed in subdivision (b).

(d) Within 90 days of receiving the completed application for a new license or a license renewal, the licensing authority shall give written notice to the applicant of the licensing authority’s initial determination, based on its investigation thus far, of whether an applicant is a disqualified person pursuant to Section 26150, 26155, or 26170 as follows:

(1) (A) If the licensing authority makes an initial determination that, based on its investigation thus far, the applicant
 is not a disqualified person, the notice shall inform the applicant to proceed with the training requirements specified in Section 26165. The licensing authority shall then submit the applicant’s fingerprints or the renewal notification to the Department of Justice in accordance with Section 26185.

(B) The initial determination described in subparagraph (A) shall include a final determination as to whether the applicant is or is not a disqualified person pursuant to paragraph (8) of subdivision (a).

(2) If, within 90 days of receiving the completed application for a new license or a license renewal, the licensing authority determines that the applicant is a disqualified person, the notice shall inform the applicant that the request for a license has been denied, state
 the reason as to why the determination was made, and inform the applicant that they may request a hearing from a court, as outlined in Section 26206. A licensing authority providing notice under this paragraph informing the applicant that the request for a license has been denied satisfies the requirement to provide notice of a denial of a license pursuant to Section 26205.

(e) The prohibitions listed in subdivision (a) shall apply whether or not the relevant conduct, order, conviction, charge, commitment, or other relevant action took place or was issued or entered before the effective date of the act that added this subdivision.

(f) Upon determining the applicant is a disqualified person pursuant to paragraph (8) of subdivision (a), the licensing authority shall, within five days,
 submit to the National Instant Criminal Background Check System Index the full name, date of birth, and physical description of the applicant reflecting that the applicant meets the criteria of paragraph (3) of subdivision (g) of Section 922 of Title 18 of the United States Code and regulations issued pursuant thereto, and shall include supporting documentation validating any identifying information provided about the applicant and the licensing authority’s determination. The supporting documentation required under this subdivision shall include proof of an arrest or a conviction, results of a test administered on the
 applicant or substance, or documentation of the admission of use, as applicable, as well as the date of any such arrest, conviction, test, or admission. Unless the licensing authority’s document retention policies provide for a longer period, the licensing authority shall
 retain any such supporting documentation for 12 months from the date of submission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 570, Sec. 8.   (AB 1078)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

26205.

(a) (1) The licensing authority shall give written notice to the applicant indicating if the license under this chapter is approved or denied. The licensing authority shall give this notice within 120 days of receiving the completed application for a new license, or 30 days after receipt of the information from the Department of Justice described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 26185, whichever is later.

(2) For each application for a license renewal submitted prior to September 1, 2026, the licensing authority shall give this notice within 120 days of receiving the completed application for a license renewal.

(3) For each application for a license renewal submitted on or after September 1, 2026, the licensing authority shall give this notice within 120 days of receiving the completed application for a license renewal, or 30 days after receipt of the information from the department described in paragraph (3) of subdivision (c) of Section 26185, whichever is later.

(b) If the license is denied, the notice shall state which requirement was not satisfied.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 570, Sec. 9.   (AB 1078)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

26206.

(a) If a new license or license renewal pursuant to Section 26150, 26155, or 26170 is denied or revoked based on a determination that the applicant is a disqualified person for such a license, as set forth in Section 26202, the licensing authority shall provide the applicant with the notice of this determination as required under subdivision (d) of Section 26202, Section 26205, or paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 26195. The notice shall state the reason as to why the determination was made and also inform the applicant that they may request a hearing from a court, as provided in this section, to review the denial or revocation. The licensing authority shall provide the applicant with a copy of the most recent “Request for Hearing to
 Challenge Disqualified Person Determination” form prescribed by the Department of
 Justice under this section.

(b) The department shall develop a “Request for Hearing to Challenge Disqualified Person Determination” form for use throughout the state. The form shall include an authorization for the release of the applicant’s criminal history records to the appropriate court solely for use in the hearing conducted pursuant to this section. The “Request for Hearing to Challenge Disqualified Person Determination” form is deemed to be a local form expressly exempt from the requirements of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code).

(c) Except as specified in paragraph (2), an applicant shall have 30 days after the receipt of the notice of denial described in subdivision
 (a) to request a hearing to review the denial or revocation from the superior court of their county of residence or, for nonresident applicants, the county in which the application was submitted. The request for hearing shall be made on the “Request for Hearing to Challenge Disqualified Person Determination” form prescribed by the department.

(1) Nothing in this section prevents a licensing authority from requiring an applicant to use and exhaust any process for appealing a denial or revocation that may be offered by the licensing authority prior to 30 days after the receipt of the notice of denial described in subdivision (a) before the applicant may request a hearing as described in this subdivision. Licensing authorities that require applicants to use such a process shall resolve any appeal within 60 days of when the appeal is
 filed.

(2) If an applicant uses and exhausts any process for appealing a denial or revocation that is offered by the licensing authority as described in paragraph (1), an applicant shall have 30 days after receiving notice of an unsuccessful appeal to request a hearing to review the denial or revocation from the superior court of their county of residence. The request for hearing shall be made on the “Request for Hearing to Challenge Disqualified Person Determination” form prescribed by the department.

(d) (1) An applicant who has requested a hearing under this section shall be given a hearing. The clerk of the court shall set a hearing date and notify the person, the licensing authority, the department, and the district attorney. The people of the State of California
 shall be the plaintiff in the proceeding and shall be represented by the district attorney. Within 14 days after receiving from the clerk of the court the request for a hearing, the department shall file copies of the applicant’s criminal history report described in this section with the superior court under seal, if the department received the applicant’s fingerprints from the licensing authority, and the licensing authority shall file any records or reports on which it relied in denying or revoking the license at issue with the superior court. The licensing authority may also, or instead, file a declaration that summarizes the information it relied upon in denying or revoking the license at issue. The reports filed by the department and the licensing authority shall be disclosed to the person and to the district attorney upon request. The court, upon motion of the applicant establishing that confidential
 information is likely to be discussed during the hearing that would cause harm to the person, shall conduct the hearing in camera, with only the relevant parties present, unless the court finds that the public interest would be better served by conducting the hearing in public.

(2) The court shall set the hearing within 60 days of receipt of the request for a hearing. Upon showing good cause, the district attorney shall be entitled to a continuance not to exceed 30 days after the district attorney was notified of the hearing date by the clerk of the court. If additional continuances are granted, the total length of time for continuances shall not exceed 60 days.

(3) Notwithstanding any other law, declarations, police reports, including criminal history information, and any other
 material and relevant evidence that is not excluded under Section 352 of the Evidence Code shall be admissible at the hearing under this section.

(e) The people shall bear the burden of showing by a preponderance of the evidence that the applicant is a disqualified person in accordance with Section 26202.

(f) If the court finds at the hearing that the people have not met their burden, or if the district attorney declines or fails to go forward in the hearing, the court shall order as follows:

(1) If the applicant was denied a new license or license renewal, the court shall order that the person shall not be deemed a disqualified person to receive a new license or license renewal pursuant to Section 26150, 26155, or 26170, and
 that the licensing authority issue notice to proceed with the training requirements and submit the applicant’s fingerprints or the renewal notification in accordance with paragraph (1) of subdivision (d) of Section 26202. The Department of Justice shall then confirm the applicant’s eligibility to possess, receive, own, or purchase a firearm in a manner prescribed through regulations. A copy of the order shall be submitted to the Department of Justice.

(2) If the applicant’s license was revoked, the court shall order that the person’s license be reinstated with the original expiration date extended by the length of time between the date of the revocation notice provided under paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 26195 and the date of the court’s order so long as the Department of Justice confirms the applicant’s eligibility to possess,
 receive, own, or purchase a firearm in a manner prescribed through regulation. A copy of the order shall be submitted to the Department of Justice.

(g) If the court finds that the people have met their burden to show by a preponderance of the evidence that the applicant is a disqualified person in accordance with Section 26202, the court shall inform the person of their right to file a subsequent application for a license no sooner than two years from the date of the hearing.

(h) If an applicant has been denied a license or had a license revoked based on any ground outlined in Section 26202 two or more times in a 10-year period, which determination was either not challenged or upheld at a hearing under this section, any subsequent hearings under this section for the applicant shall be conducted
 as described in this section, with the exception that the burden of proof shall be on the applicant to establish by a preponderance of the evidence that the applicant is not a disqualified person in accordance with Section 26202.

(i) If a new license or license renewal pursuant to Section 26150, 26155, or 26170 is denied or revoked based on the applicant’s failure to satisfy paragraph (2), (3), (4), or (5) of subdivision (a) of Section 26150, paragraph (2), (3), (4), or (5) of subdivision (a) of Section 26155, or paragraph (2), (3), or (4) of subdivision (a) of Section 26170, the licensing authority shall provide the applicant with the notice required under Section 26205 or paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 26195, as applicable, and inform the applicant that they may apply to the superior court of the county in which they reside for a writ
 of mandate pursuant to Section 1085 of the Code of Civil Procedure. Except as specified in paragraph (2), the application for writ of mandate shall be made within 30 days after the receipt of the notice of denial or the notice of revocation.

(1) Nothing in this section prevents a licensing authority from requiring an applicant to use and exhaust any process for appealing a denial or revocation that may be offered by the licensing authority prior to 30 days after the receipt of the notice of denial described in subdivision (a). Licensing authorities that require applicants to use such a process shall resolve any appeal within 60 days of when the appeal is filed.

(2) If an applicant uses and exhausts any process for appealing a denial or revocation that is offered by the licensing
 authority as described in paragraph (1), an applicant shall have 30 days after receiving notice of an unsuccessful appeal to file the application for writ of mandate described in this subdivision.

(j) For the purposes of this section, “criminal history report” is defined as information provided by the Department of Justice in accordance with subdivision (a) of Section 26185, paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 26185, and paragraph (3) of subdivision (c) of Section 26185, as well as firearms eligibility notices or any other information subsequently provided to the licensing authority regarding the applicant.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 570, Sec. 10.   (AB 1078)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

26210.

(a) When a licensee under this chapter has a change of address, the license shall be amended to reflect the new address and a new license shall be issued pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 26215.

(b) The licensee shall notify the licensing authority in writing within 10 days of any change in the licensee’s place of residence, and within 10 days of receiving that notice, the licensing authority shall notify the Department of Justice of the change in a licensee’s place of residence.

(c) If both of the following conditions are satisfied, a license to carry a concealed handgun may not be revoked solely because the licensee’s
 place of residence has changed to another county:

(1) The licensee has not breached any of the conditions or restrictions set forth in the license or imposed in accordance with Section 26200.

(2) The licensee has not become prohibited by state or federal law from possessing, receiving, owning, or purchasing a firearm.

(d) Notwithstanding subdivision (c), if a licensee’s place of residence was the basis for issuance of a license, any license issued pursuant to Section 26150 or 26155 shall expire 90 days after the licensee moves from the county of issuance.

(e) If the license is one to carry loaded and exposed a pistol, revolver, or other firearm capable of being
 concealed upon the person, the license shall be revoked immediately upon a change of the licensee’s place of residence to another county.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 249, Sec. 24.   (SB 2)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

26215.
